Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-929
Person; challenge as to residence; examination; provisional ballot.

If a person is challenged on the ground that he or she is not a resident of this state, the county, or the precinct, the person shall answer the following questions on the form provided by the election commissioner or county clerk:

Do you have a residence in this state: Yes or No?

Do you have a residence in this county: Yes or No?

Do you have a residence in this precinct: Yes or No?

If a person has moved from one residence to another within the precinct in which he or she is registered to vote, such voter shall be entitled to vote as provided in section 32-914.02. If a person has moved from one residence to another within the county in which he or she is registered to vote, such voter shall be entitled to vote a provisional ballot as provided in section 32-915.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 272;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 89;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 29.